http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/31food.html?ex=1338264000&en=c2f4b1d990f5301d&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Melamine From U.S. Put in Feed From U.S. Put in Feed since pet food contaminated with an industrial chemical was traced to shipments of wheat flour from China, American officials have concentrated on cracking down on imports. It turns out the problem was closer to home, too. Yesterday, federal officials announced that a manufacturing plant in was using the same banned substance, melamine, to make binding agents that ended up in feed for farmed fish, shrimp and livestock. The problem surfaced after a distributor, concerned about what was in its feed binders after the reports from China, sent the product to a private laboratory for testing. The melamine was used by BTLSR, a Canadian forest products company with a small chemical plant in Toledo, to make binding agents that keep pellets of animal feed together, said Dr. David Acheson, assistant commissioner for food protection at the Food and Drug Administration Melamine is not permitted in food or pet food products. In the last few months, pet food contaminated with melamine, all traced back to China, sickened or killed thousands of pets Acheson said the levels of melamine and melamine-related compounds in Tembec&#8217;s products were far lower than that found in wheat flour from China that ended up killing the pets. Consequently, the authorities said that they thought the contamination did not appear to pose a risk to human health. Nevertheless, the F.D.A. issued a voluntary recall of finished feed made with two binding agents: Aquabond and Aqua-Tec II, which are made by Tembec and used in fish and shrimp feed. A third product, Xtra-Bond, which is made by a Colorado firm called Uniscope using Tembec ingredients, was not recalled because the levels of melamine were low. Uniscope is the distributor of all three products. Aquabond and Aqua-Tec II are sold mostly overseas; Xtra-Bond is sold domestically. Agency officials are alerting the foreign governments that received the products, Dr. Acheson said. The investigation began on May 18 when Uniscope alerted the agency that it had discovered melamine in the testing. Dr. Acheson said that the investigation was in its early stages and that some questions remained unanswered, like how long Tembec had used melamine in its products and the extent of the contamination. &#8220;What Tembec knew, didn&#8217;t know, what their activities were, is part of the investigation,&#8221; Dr. Acheson said, Earlier, he said, &#8220;It&#8217;s hard to believe that a manufacturer of pet food would not know about this.&#8221; Federal officials would not say whether they would pursue criminal charges in the Tembec case. They said that they had already been contacting domestic manufacturers to make sure they were aware of the sources of their ingredients. John Valley, Tembec&#8217;s executive vice president for business development and corporate affairs, said his company thought that Uniscope was shipping the binders overseas for use as shrimp feed. Once the F.D.A. told it that the binders were being used domestically, Tembec stopped making them from melamine, Mr. Valley said. Tembec makes resins and certain chemicals for industrial uses, including melamine. Mr. Valley said Uniscope was the only customer that used its products for animal feed. Asked why it was all right to use melamine in feed for shrimp overseas but not he said: &#8220;Melamine has just really had a focus that&#8217;s come upon it. A lot of companies and agencies are reviewing certain applications of melamine.&#8221; The pet food scandal has led to increased scrutiny of all food imports, particularly those from China, and threatened trade relations. Some members of Congress have demanded tougher inspections of food imports from China. &#8220;This recent incident goes to show that we apparently have some bad actors out there,&#8221; said Michael Doyle, director of the Center for Food Safety at the . &#8220;It can happen But Mr. Doyle pointed out that the incidence of food illness remains relatively rare problem with the Tembec binders surfaced after Uniscope, a company based in Johnstown, Colo., decided to test the binders. &#8220;They just asked themselves, &#8216;I wonder what&#8217;s in this stuff? I wonder if we have anything in here that shouldn&#8217;t be in here?&#8217; &#8221; said Charlie Russell, a company spokesman. &#8220;So they sent some samples to a lab.&#8221; Tembec has been a supplier to Uniscope since January 2004, at Uniscope, which was founded in 1975 and is family owned, thought that they were buying a resin that was fit for animal consumption, sells the binders to feed manufacturers that mix them with grain and other ingredients to make food pellets for livestock and fish, he said. The binders are sold both domestically and abroad, to filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Tembec acquired BTLSR Toledo, a custom manufacturer of spray-dry resins, for $8.5 million in 2003. (3 of 30) Questions 2 Companies in Contaminated Toothpaste Exports An Export Boom Suddenly Facing A Quality Crisis; Customers Worldwide Pressing Beijing to Act After Tainted-Food Case Who's Watching What We Eat? Food Contamination and Poisoning Hazardous and Toxic Substances Recalls and Bans of Products (3 of 30) &#x00bb; MOST POPULAR - BUSINESS Bumped Fliers and No Plan B Economix: India, Grandma Cooks, They Deliver Is Wal-Mart Too Cheap for Its Own Good? Advertising: Telling India&#8217;s Modern Women They Have Power, Even Over Their Skin Tone Wachovia to Buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 Billion Ernst & Young Won&#8217;t Face Criminal Charges Europe Pushes to Get Fuel From Fields Lens Fluid Maker Says Link to Infection Unsolved Lawmakers to See the Fallen Is No Favor The High Price of Creating Free Ads Apple's Lesson for Sony's Stores: Just Connect More Than Ever, It Pays to Be the Top Executive Is Wal-Mart Too Cheap for Its Own Good? Test of Drug for Diabetes in Jeopardy Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St. Grandma Cooks, They Deliver a Complete Savings Acct from E*TRADE Bank
http://www.nytimes.com/pages/health/index.html
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/us/31tb.html Near Misses Allowed Man With Tuberculosis to Fly Misses Allowed Man With Tuberculosis to Fly series of “understandable” near misses accounted for a Georgia man’s odyssey to Europe in which he might have exposed fellow passengers on a series of commercial flights to an exceptionally dangerous form of , federal officials said yesterday. Skip to next paragraph Dr. Martin S. Cetron in Atlanta Wednesday. Back Story With The Times&#146;s Anahad O’Connor ( TB Patient Is Isolated After Taking Two Flights The man is being detained under a federal isolation order in an Atlanta hospital for treatment of extremely resistant tuberculosis, which is often lethal. American officials and those in many other countries, meanwhile, are seeking to advise more than 100 passengers who sat closest to him on the longest flights and crew members to infection. Health officials are also offering testing to hundreds of other passengers on the flights. It was the first airline-contact tracing investigation for extremely drug-resistant tuberculosis, and it exposed many flaws that need to be fixed for future episodes, officials of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention said in Atlanta. While many infectious-disease experts and ethicists supported the agency’s action, at least one strongly criticized it as over-reacting. Among the problems the agency identified were dealing with time zone differences; a lack of coordination between American and international authorities concerning how to medically isolate the man while he was abroad; and how to speed the retrieval of passenger manifests from airlines. The episode also raised questions about how rapidly health officials could respond to a similar emergency with other deadly infectious diseases. Even after the news conference, many other questions remained unanswered, including why it took health officials in Georgia so long to try to deliver a letter that explicitly told the man, whose identity was not disclosed, not to fly abroad for his honeymoon. In an interview published yesterday in The Atlanta Journal-Constitution, the man disputed statements from disease agency officials about warnings it said Fulton County officials gave him about flying abroad. The agency said he was told not to fly. The man told the paper that said they “preferred” that he not go abroad for his honeymoon and did not advise him to take any precautions. “There are different perspectives on who said what to whom when,” said Dr. Martin S. Cetron, who directs agency’s division of global migration and quarantine. “It is very unfortunate that this whole situation wasn’t prevented” before the man flew with 432 other passengers and 18 crew members to Paris from Atlanta on Air France 385 on May 12, Dr. Cetron said. He took at least five flights within Europe and then flew with 190 other passengers and nine crew members from Prague to Montreal on Czech Air 104 on May 25. The in Atlanta met with the man and his family on May 10, two days before he flew to Paris, and told them that he should not travel because he had multi-resistant tuberculosis, the disease agency said. No legal order was issued at the time, Dr. Cetron said in referring further questions to the Calls to the yesterday were not returned. The extraordinary dangerous form of the tuberculosis was not detected until May 22, while he was in Europe. Dr. Cetron said that an agency officer telephoned the man in Rome and explicitly told him not to fly on a commercial plane — doctors believe prolonged exposure is needed to spread tuberculosis — while the agency worked out options to bring him back to included an air ambulance. By the time a former disease agency doctor, who is working in Rome, arrived at the man’s hotel, the couple had left, Dr. Cetron said. The agency was in the process of putting the man’s name on a no-fly list. But by this time he had cut short his honeymoon that was supposed to last into June and was landing in Montreal. The efforts “weren’t fast enough,” Dr. Cetron said, adding that “we certainly will be learning lessons and looking to improve” current systems. The man drove to the United States and somewhere between Albany and New York spoke with Dr. Cetron, who instructed him on how to continue to Bellevue Hospital in Manhattan. There, he was isolated for 72 hours until the disease agency flew him in its plane to Atlanta on Monday. The man told the Atlanta paper that tuberculosis was detected by accident when he had a chest X-ray in January for another undisclosed problem. Patient Is Isolated After Taking Two Flights TB Declines, but Not in Immigrants Tuberculosis Cases Prompt Warning on Raw-Milk Cheese Infections in Newly Freed Inmates Are a Rising Concern Centers for Disease Control and Prevention &#x00bb; Explodes In Lakehurst, NJ - May 6 - 1937
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/health/31aids.html Center Health & Behavior Center May 30 &#151; The on Wednesday advised health workers in countries hard hit by to urge every patient to rather than to simply offer tests in limited circumstances. That is a more aggressive approach than what is commonly taken now or has previously been approved by the health organization. Until now, the W.H.O. and the AIDS agency had advised health workers in areas where H.I.V. is prevalent to offer tests if treatment is available, but not to recommend a test to every patient. Quite often, health workers administer a test only if the patient actively seeks one. The shift in strategy is born out of a stark reality, officials said: two decades into the AIDS epidemic, about four out of five people who are infected in low- to middle-income nations do not know that they carry H.I.V., the virus that causes AIDS. In sub-Saharan Africa, where the epidemic is centered, nearly 20 million people do not know they are infected, officials estimate. Their ignorance is costly. Those who do not know they are infected are more likely to infect others and less likely to seek early treatment, experts said. That means it costs more and takes more effort to save them with antiretroviral drugs. To curb the epidemic&#8217;s spread, &#8220;an H.I.V. diagnosis is an essential first step,&#8221; Kevin De Cock, head of the H.I.V.-AIDS division of the health organization, said during a telephone news conference. Evidence of the value of routine H.I.V. testing in nations swept by AIDS has been mounting for at least three years. In January 2004, Botswana&#8217;s government ordered its health care workers to recommend an H.I.V. test to every patient who showed up at a clinic or hospital, regardless of why he or she sought treatment. Testing rates skyrocketed. Zambia, Malawi, Kenya and Uganda now have similar policies. &#8220;The Botswana experience taught us that people want to be cared for, that they would like medical intervention&#8221; said Dr. Ernest Darkoh, who ran Botswana&#8217;s AIDS treatment program in 2004. Many patients were actually relieved when a health care worker urged them to take an H.I.V. test, he said, because it lifted some of the burden of a scary decision. Still, some human rights advocates have argued that because of the stigma of AIDS, no one should be pushed to take a test that could lead to the loss of their employment or abandonment by their families. Wednesday&#8217;s announcement, some AIDS experts said, strikes a balance between individual rights and the demands of a public health emergency. While tests must continue to be voluntary and confidential, they said, health care workers must advocate them as a standard part of medical care in countries with pervasive epidemics. &#8220;I believe these guidelines are long, long overdue and require rapid implementation,&#8221; said Zachie Achmat, a leading AIDS activist in South Africa. &#8220;It would be entirely substandard medical practice not to recommend that any person in a high-burden country While health organizations and United Nations AIDS program have been stressing the importance of widespread H.I.V. testing for years, Dr. De Cock said earlier guidelines were too ambiguous. &#8220;You could legitimately ask, &#8216;Have we used H.I.V. testing in the most imaginative and beneficial way?&#8217; &#8221; he said. &#8220;I think we feel that, somehow, let&#8217;s get serious and do this right.&#8221; The new guidelines state that unless the patient specifically refuses one, an H.I.V. test should be performed if the patient&#8217;s symptoms or medical histories suggest infection. That would include the children of infected mothers and anyone with . More broadly, the guidelines state that in any nation where more than one percent of pregnant women have H.I.V., every patient who shows up at a clinic or hospital should be tested, regardless of symptoms. That would cover a swath of sub-Saharan African countries. Dr. De Cock said that the cost of expanding testing is minor compared with the overall cost of AIDS prevention and treatment. But he said that the new policy would likely depend on hiring and training more low-level health care workers because there are far too few doctors or nurses in low-income countries to handle the task. (1 of 14) Sell; Preventing H.I.V., but at What Price? Mayor Doubtful About Government's Role in Anti-AIDS Circumcision Plan W.H.O. Urges Circumcision To Reduce Spread of AIDS Circumcision's Anti-AIDS Effect Found Greater Than First Thought Acquired Immune Deficiency Syndrome (1 of 14) &#x00bb; Everything you need to know about heart disease Hip resurfacing: is it right for you? The changing attitudes towards "chemo brain" Treating the awkward years Improving Patient Care through Technology
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/washington/31prexy.html Bush Requests $30 Billion to Fight AIDS Requests $30 Billion to Fight AIDS May 30 — President Bush called Wednesday for Congress to spend $30 billion to fight global over the next five years, a near doubling of financing that is part of a White House effort to burnish Mr. Bush’s humanitarian credentials before he meets leaders of the industrialized nations next week. Skip to next paragraph Doug Mills/The Bush with Baron Mosima Loyiso Tantoh, 4, and his mother, Manyongo Mosima Tantoh, who is H.I.V. positive. Bush's Proposal for AIDS Program Center The initiative, if approved, would build on a program that grew out of the president’s 2003 State of the Union address, when he asked for $15 billion over five years for prevention, treatment and care of AIDS patients in developing countries. Congress approved more than $18 billion, but the program is set to expire next year. Mr. Bush’s announcement, delivered in the White House Rose Garden, adds to what has become an unexpectedly high priority for the White House. AIDS was not a signature issue for Mr. Bush when he ran for office in 2000. But it has become one in part because the Christian conservatives who make up his political base have embraced it, and in part because Mr. Bush wants to build a legacy for the United States and a more compassionate image abroad to counter international criticism of American policies in the wake of the Sept. 11, 2001, attacks. That sentiment was reflected in Mr. Bush’s remarks on Wednesday. “Once again, the generosity of the American people is one of the great untold stories of our time,” he said. “Our citizens are offering comfort to millions who suffer, and restoring hope to those who feel forsaken.” AIDS advocacy organizations praised Mr. Bush for proposing the additional money, but said the plan — which he said would provide drugs for 2.5 million patients — did not go nearly far enough toward meeting the international community’s stated goal of treating the estimated 10 million patients in developing nations. “It’s a modest increase, it’s important that he reaffirmed it, but we will need the next president to do more,” said Paul Zeitz, executive director of the Global AIDS Alliance, a nonprofit advocacy group. “We’re not getting ahead of the AIDS crisis. We’re tempering it.” Administration officials concede that point and say the White House is hoping Mr. Bush’s announcement will prod other Group of 8 countries, as well as nations that have growing economies, to make spending commitments of their own. “The goal of universal access isn’t a United States goal, it’s a global goal,” said Mark R. Dybul, the administration’s global AIDS coordinator. “The rest of the world is going to need to respond if we are going to achieve these goals.” International development and human rights issues will be high on the agenda of next week’s summit, but so will — an issue on which Mr. Bush finds himself at odds with his fellow Group of 8 leaders, notably the meeting’s host, Chancellor Angela Merkel of Germany. Dan Bartlett, counselor to Mr. Bush, said the president intended to address climate change in a speech on Thursday at the United States Agency for International Development. But so far this week, Mr. Bush has been devoting most of his attention to human rights and poverty, issues that draw him less criticism than his stance on climate change. In an interview Monday night, a senior administration official said Mr. Bush planned to spend the week in advance of the Group of 8 conference spotlighting humanitarian issues and “demonstrating U.S. leadership around the world.” On Tuesday, Mr. Bush announced he was imposing stiff economic sanctions on Sudan to press its government into cooperating with a peacekeeping force that is trying to end the violence in Darfur. On Wednesday, in addition to the AIDS announcement, Mr. Bush named , his former trade representative, as his candidate to head the , calling the nominee “a committed internationalist” who “wants to help struggling nations defeat poverty.” In Thursday’s speech, Mr. Bush also intends to talk about education programs in the developing world, and his initiative to combat The AIDS initiative, which is likely to generate bipartisan support in Congress, would cover federal spending for the 2009 to 2013 fiscal years, meaning the vast majority of the money would be spent after Mr. Bush left office. To promote it, the White House is sending to Africa next month. “She and I share a passion,” Mr. Bush said. “We believe that to whom much is given, much is required.” The United Nations reports that there are nearly 40 million people worldwide living with H.I.V., the virus that causes AIDS; last year three million died from their infections. In his announcement in 2003, Mr. Bush said he was committed to offering treatment for two million H.I.V. patients by 2008. But so far, he said, the program, called the President’s Emergency Plan for AIDS Relief, has paid for treatment for just 1.1 million people in 15 nations. Advocates complain that the new goal, bringing the number of patients treated to 2.5 million, is not that much more ambitious than the old one. “By 2013 there will be 12 million people that urgently need medicines,” Mr. Zeitz said. The White House, however, said that in addition to providing treatment for 2.5 million, the new money would prevent 12 million new infections and provide care for more than 12 million people. Mr. Bartlett said the president was convinced America’s image in the world would improve because of it. “I’ve heard him talk about this is a part of America that gets overlooked,” he said, “and that over time, people will look back and say, ‘At a point in time where America may have been under scrutiny for other reasons, look at the significant contribution they have made. They saved more lives than anybody could have imagined.’ ” Finds Bush's AIDS Effort Limited by Restrictions Circumcision's Anti-AIDS Effect Found Greater Than First Thought Bush Gets Aid Of Democrats In Fighting Pandemics Cheap Solutions Cut AIDS Toll for Poor Kenyan Youths Acquired Immune Deficiency Syndrome Third World and Developing Countries &#x00bb;
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/fashion/31Physical.html?ex=1338264000&en=06f577ca9763c474&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss For Those Who Sweat, Some Small Stuff Those Who Sweat, Some Small Stuff SARAH BOWEN SHEA stay hydrated, athletes must replace electrolytes like sodium and potassium that are lost in sweat. But many triathletes and runners prefer to eat their carbohydrates (like chewy bars) instead of gulping Gatorade or Cytomax, carb-loaded drinks with a hint of electrolytes. This long-distance set now has a new option that leaves carbohydrates out of the equation: electrolyte-drink tablets. Skip to next paragraph Tony Cenicola/The tablets offer athletes a new option for electrolytes. Basic Training: Modern Marathoners Have Fewer Miles on Them Don’t Be So Quick to Hit the Road, One Program Says Tony Cenicola/The makers figure athletes already eat enough energy bars and gels to meet the roughly 80-gram limit that their bodies can shuttle to their muscles in an hour. “These tablets are catching on among triathletes,” said Duane Franks, a San Francisco-based coach of endurance athletes. “Sports drinks often don’t have enough electrolytes in them.” Carbohydrates can be tough for some to stomach midrace, so electrolyte-only drinks are marketed as easy to digest. But our tester, Deborah Shulman, a sports nutritionist in Bellvue, Colo., had stomach upset with half the brands she tried on bike rides of two to three hours. During breaks, Dr. Shulman, who has a Ph.D. in physiology, refilled her water bottles and popped in tablets that fizz like Alka-Seltzer (no stirring needed). NUUN PORTABLE ELECTROLYTE HYDRATION $19.50 for three 12-tablet tubes, www.nuun.com. Dr. Shulman liked the new Kona Kola best of the four flavors, but said, in all, "the salt was quite apparent." She had "brief stomach upset after drinking Nuun, but it would quickly dissipate" and it didn't interfere with her workouts. After cycling, she was "less dehydrated than" she was with other tablets, possibly because Nuun has the highest sodium and potassium levels. $9.95 for 12-tablet tube, www.rei.com. Introduced in April, Elixir has "excellent digestibility." It didn't give Dr. Shulman the "stomach lurch" she got with Nuun and Zym. Its lemon-lime flavor "was the lightest and most pleasant" of all those tested, and Dr. Shulman liked how it "remained light as the liquid got warmer" during a ride, instead of becoming saltier, as the Nuun did. Elixir dissolved the fastest — in 90 seconds. ZYM PORTABLE ELECTROLYTE DRINK $23.49 for three 10-tablet tubes, www.gozym.com. Zym tablets were Dr. Shulman's least favorite. They left her mouth feeling "coated with thick spit" and also gave her "some stomach upset every time." (She suspected magnesium was the culprit.) Zym did, however, keep her "well hydrated," but Dr. Shulman thought the six added vitamins and four electrolytes were "an overkill of ingredients." & Style (8 of 9) of Lance's Slipstream, A Trainer Reinvents Himself When Being Varsity-Fit Masks an Eating Disorder PHYSICAL CULTURE; Putting the Gym Back In Gym Class New Breed of Trainers Are Proving Fat Is Fit & Style (8 of 9) &#x00bb; De Gustibus: Don&#8217;t Point That Menu at My Child, Please Basic Training: Modern Marathoners Have Fewer Miles on Them Design That Solves Problems for the World&#8217;s Poor Big Disparities in Judging of Asylum Cases Fighting the Tide, a Few Restaurants Tilt to Tap Water Op-Ed Contributor: Physician, Upgrade Thyself Op-Ed Contributor: Fliers and No Plan B Economix: Go, Eat, You Never Know Fault Harsh Methods in Interrogation Deal Said to Bring U.S. Scrutiny Iraqi Refugees, in Dire Straits, Turn to the Sex Trade in Syria Giuliani Tempers Tough Image on Campaign Justices' Ruling Limits Suits on Pay Disparity Hitherto Staunch G.O.P. Voters Souring on Iraq your wedding a day to remember In the Weddings Directory: View All Paid Announcements Search Vendors & Services Post Your Paid Announcement
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/washington/31fda.html F.D.A. Still Unsettled in Wake of New Questions Still Unsettled in Wake of New Questions Md., May 30 &#151; When Dr. Andrew C. von Eschenbach took over the Food and Drug Administration in 2005, the agency had a crisis over drug approvals that had missed or ignored dangerous side effects in Vioxx, antidepressants and other prominent medications. improvements, and agency officials said they would no longer be caught flatfooted on drug safety. But this month, The New England Journal of Medicine published a study suggesting that a major pill, Avandia, might increase the risk of heart attacks. Concerns over that drug and others have led and Democrats in the House and the Senate to call for investigations. A House hearing is planned for June 6. in a briefing on Wednesday that his agency needed to collaborate more closely with drug companies. &#8220;The point is that we need to look at the role of the F.D.A. in being a bridge to the future, not a barrier to the future,&#8221; he said at his office here. Responding to a suggestion that promoting collaborations with drug makers, including an effort to modernize human testing and find genetic markers to predict suffering from side effects, may not be politic, the agency was not working solely with pharmaceutical companies. &#8220;It&#8217;s with everyone,&#8221; including government agencies and independent scientists, he said. He defended the agency in the Avandia case, saying, &#8220;I believe we did it right with regard to Avandia.&#8221; Hints of the heart risks from Avandia were, however, present from the beginning. The original trials, overseen by , the drug&#8217;s maker, showed that patients taking the drug had more than twice the rate of ischemic as recipients of placebos. The medical reviewer for the F.D.A. expressed concerns, but in a further analysis decided that it was less of a problem. The hearing next week may highlight the growing internal dissension between officials who approve drugs and those who track the safety of drugs after they have been approval. Tension between the groups has long been common, but in recent months it has erupted into sniping. Congressional investigators said the safety group recommended months ago that the drug agency put its severest warning on Avandia. The review group, which holds sway, has not done so. The sniping became public in an exchange at an advisory committee hearing last month on whether to approve a new On one side was Dr. David Graham, author of an internal report that found that Avandia substantially increased the risks of heart attack, findings similar to the medical journal&#8217;s report. On the other, Dr. Robert J. Meyer, an office director in the drug review division, and his boss, Dr. John Jenkins, were in a group deciding against warning about the potential risks. There was little chance that the advisory committee or the drug agency would approve the arthritis drug, Arcoxia, at the hearing. Behind the scenes, agency officials were battling over Avandia. Dr. Graham told the committee that top agency officials had demanded an unreasonable level of certainty about a drug&#8217;s risks before agreeing to warn the public. &#8220;They assume it&#8217;s safe,&#8221; Dr. Graham said of the top officials&#8217; analyses of safety data. &#8220;Which is just looking at things all the way wrong.&#8221; Dr. Jenkins said Dr. Graham&#8217;s &#8220;characterization of how we look at safety data is simply false.&#8221; &#8220;We make our best informed judgment about what the regulatory action should be,&#8221; Dr. Jenkins added. , Republican of Iowa, and others on Capitol Hill, say the rift between the approval office and the safety office means that the two must separate and that the safety group must have more power. Mr. Grassley proposed such a split in an amendment this month; it failed by one vote. Top House staff members said the Avandia case had breathed new life into Mr. Grassley&#8217;s proposal, because the House will soon debate changing the drug agency. Curt Furberg, a professor of public health sciences at Wake Forest and a co-author of the New England Journal of Medicine&#8217;s editorial on Avandia, said the agency remained broken. &#8220;Safety is just not a high priority for them,&#8221; said Dr. Furberg, who serves on the F.D.A. Drug Safety and Risk Management Advisory Committee. the agency intended to warn patients rapidly when it received information that a drug might be unsafe. He added that the agency had to find a way to ensure that patients did not overreact to uncertain safety problems. Says F.D.A. Was Lax on Label for Avandia Years Ago, Agency Was Warned of a Drug&#8217;s Risks Agency Approves a Birth Control Pill Halting Periods Indefinitely For Drug Makers, a Downside to Full Disclosure Food and Drug Administration von Eschenbach, Andrew C &#x00bb; PRESIDENTS
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/business/31food.html?ex=1338264000&en=c2f4b1d990f5301d&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Melamine From U.S. Put in Feed - From U.S. Put in Feed May 31, 2007 Ever since pet food contaminated with an industrial chemical was traced to shipments of wheat flour from China, American officials have concentrated on cracking down on imports. It turns out the problem was closer to home, too. Yesterday, federal officials announced that a manufacturing plant in was using the same banned substance, melamine, to make binding agents that ended up in feed for farmed fish, shrimp and livestock. The problem surfaced after a distributor, concerned about what was in its feed binders after the reports from China, sent the product to a private laboratory for testing. The melamine was used by BTLSR, a Canadian forest products company with a small chemical plant in Toledo, to make binding agents that keep pellets of animal feed together, said Dr. David Acheson, assistant commissioner for food protection at the Food and Drug Administration Melamine is not permitted in food or pet food products. In the last few months, pet food contaminated with melamine, all traced back to China, sickened or killed thousands of pets in the United States. Dr. Acheson said the levels of melamine and melamine-related compounds in Tembec&#8217;s products were far lower than that found in wheat flour from China that ended up killing the pets. Consequently, the authorities said that they thought the contamination did not appear to pose a risk to human health. Nevertheless, the F.D.A. issued a voluntary recall of finished feed made with two binding agents: Aquabond and Aqua-Tec II, which are made by Tembec and used in fish and shrimp feed. A third product, Xtra-Bond, which is made by a Colorado firm called Uniscope using Tembec ingredients, was not recalled because the levels of melamine were low. Uniscope is the distributor of all three products. Aquabond and Aqua-Tec II are sold mostly overseas; Xtra-Bond is sold domestically. Agency officials are alerting the foreign governments that received the products, Dr. Acheson said. The investigation began on May 18 when Uniscope alerted the agency that it had discovered melamine in the testing. Dr. Acheson said that the investigation was in its early stages and that some questions remained unanswered, like how long Tembec had used melamine in its products and the extent of the contamination. &#8220;What Tembec knew, didn&#8217;t know, what their activities were, is part of the investigation,&#8221; Dr. Acheson said, at a news conference. Earlier, he said, &#8220;It&#8217;s hard to believe that a manufacturer of pet food would not know about this.&#8221; Federal officials would not say whether they would pursue criminal charges in the Tembec case. They said that they had already been contacting domestic manufacturers to make sure they were aware of the sources of their ingredients. John Valley, Tembec&#8217;s executive vice president for business development and corporate affairs, said his company thought that Uniscope was shipping the binders overseas for use as shrimp feed. Once the F.D.A. told it that the binders were being used domestically, Tembec stopped making them from melamine, Mr. Valley said. Tembec makes resins and certain chemicals for industrial uses, including melamine. Mr. Valley said Uniscope was the only customer that used its products for animal feed. Asked why it was all right to use melamine in feed for shrimp overseas but not in the United States, he said: &#8220;Melamine has just really had a focus that&#8217;s come upon it. A lot of companies and agencies are reviewing certain applications of melamine.&#8221; The pet food scandal has led to increased scrutiny of all food imports, particularly those from China, and threatened trade relations. Some members of Congress have demanded tougher inspections of food imports from China. &#8220;This recent incident goes to show that we apparently have some bad actors out there,&#8221; said Michael Doyle, director of the Center for Food Safety at the . &#8220;It can happen in the United States.&#8221; But Mr. Doyle pointed out that the incidence of food illness remains relatively rare in the United States. The problem with the Tembec binders surfaced after Uniscope, a company based in Johnstown, Colo., decided to test the binders. &#8220;They just asked themselves, &#8216;I wonder what&#8217;s in this stuff? I wonder if we have anything in here that shouldn&#8217;t be in here?&#8217; &#8221; said Charlie Russell, a company spokesman. &#8220;So they sent some samples to a lab.&#8221; Tembec has been a supplier to Uniscope since January 2004, Mr. Russell said. Employees at Uniscope, which was founded in 1975 and is family owned, thought that they were buying a resin that was fit for animal consumption, Mr. Russell said. Uniscope sells the binders to feed manufacturers that mix them with grain and other ingredients to make food pellets for livestock and fish, he said. The binders are sold both domestically and abroad, Mr. Russell said. According to filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Tembec acquired BTLSR Toledo, a custom manufacturer of spray-dry resins, for $8.5 million in 2003. (4 of 31) Questions 2 Companies in Contaminated Toothpaste Exports An Export Boom Suddenly Facing A Quality Crisis; Customers Worldwide Pressing Beijing to Act After Tainted-Food Case Who's Watching What We Eat? Food Contamination and Poisoning Hazardous and Toxic Substances Recalls and Bans of Products (4 of 31) &#x00bb; MOST POPULAR - BUSINESS Economix: Truth, Fiction and Lou Dobbs Bumped Fliers and No Plan B In India, Grandma Cooks, They Deliver Is Wal-Mart Too Cheap for Its Own Good? Advertising: Telling India&#8217;s Modern Women They Have Power, Even Over Their Skin Tone Wachovia to Buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 Billion Ernst & Young Won&#8217;t Face Criminal Charges Europe Pushes to Get Fuel From Fields Melamine From U.S. Put in Feed Lens Fluid Maker Says Link to Infection Unsolved Fiction and Lou Dobbs Lawmakers to See the Fallen Is No Favor The High Price of Creating Free Ads Apple's Lesson for Sony's Stores: Just Connect More Than Ever, It Pays to Be the Top Executive Is Wal-Mart Too Cheap for Its Own Good? Test of Drug for Diabetes in Jeopardy Now, Spitzer Is Warming to Wall St. Grandma Cooks, They Deliver million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: U.S. Virgin Islands Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the Grand Palais The
http://www.nytimes.com/pages/health/index.html Health News - Health & Behavior Doug Mills/The Bush with Baron Mosima Loyiso Tantoh, 4, and his mother, Manyongo Mosima Tantoh, who is H.I.V. positive. Bush Requests $30 Billion to Fight AIDS By SHERYL GAY STOLBERG The near doubling of financing is part of an effort to burnish the president’s humanitarian credentials. Center Near Misses Allowed Man With Tuberculosis to Fly By LAWRENCE K. ALTMAN and JOHN SCHWARTZ Officials are seeking to advise more than 100 passengers who sat closest to him on the longest flights and crew members to infection. Back Story With The Times&#146;s Anahad O’Connor ( Center The organization advised health workers in countries hard hit by AIDS to urge every patient to rather than to simply offer tests in limited circumstances. F.D.A. Still Unsettled in Wake of New Questions Concerns over the approval of drugs that turned out to be dangerous have led Republicans and Democrats in the House and the Senate to call for investigations. Melamine From U.S. Put in Feed A manufacturing plant in Ohio was using the banned substance that ended up in feed for farmed fish, shrimp and livestock. For Those Who Sweat, Some Small Stuff By SARAH BOWEN SHEA Deborah Shulman, a sports nutritionist, tests electrolyte-drink tablets. Manufacturer of Risky Drug to Sell Shares Jazz Pharmaceuticals has filed to sell as much as $180 million in stock in its first public offering. An Answer to Help Clear His Fog Mel Renfro, a former star defensive back for the Dallas Cowboys and a member of the N.F.L. Hall of Fame, participated in a recent study linking concussions to clinical depression. Obama Calls for Wider and Less Costly Health Care Coverage TB Patient Is Isolated After Taking Two Flights Ex-Chief of China Food and Drug Unit Sentenced to Death for Graft Lens Fluid Maker Says Link to Infection Unsolved For the Tiniest Babies, the Closest Thing to a Cocoon Nature’s Tricks Help Moths Say ‘Don’t Eat Me’ With Hurricanes in the Lab, They Can Blow the House Down Books: The Brain: Malleable, Capable, Vulnerable Genome Researchers Find New Indicators of Breast Cancer Risk Turning Off Suspect Gene Makes Mice Smarter Q & A: A Bitter Cup An Implant for the Heart Gets a Jolt From Above Tod H. Mikuriya, 73, Dies; Backed Medical Marijuana Vital Signs: Prognosis: Prolonged Use of Antibiotics After Lyme May Not Help Vital Signs: Responses: In Study of Men, Lots of Coffee Appears to Lower Risk of Gout Vital Signs: Hazards: Obese Employees More Likely to Be Injured on the Job Six Killers | Stroke: Lost Chances for Survival, Before and After Stroke Outbreak of Eye Infections Puzzles Officials : Crucial Facts About Stroke Stroke is the third leading cause of death in the United States, but many strokes that could be successfully treated are not. Some parents of children with Down syndrome want prospective parents to know the positive side of raising a child with the genetic condition. : Choosing Hip Resurfacing Keith McDonald underwent hip resurfacing surgery, a newer alternative to total hip replacement. Indoor Cycling Finds Its Way Back With Proper Training ...And Do You Take This (Buff) Woman? Effective, Yes, but Is It Safe? A Drug’s Risks ‘Sicko,’ Castro and the ‘120 Years Club’ MENTAL HEALTH & BEHAVIOR» This Is Your Life (and How You Tell It) Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry’s Role Dr. Walter J. Koroshetz, deputy director of the National Institute on Neurological Disorders and Stroke, answered questions from readers. Heart disease, cancer, stroke, chronic obstructive pulmonary disease, diabetes and Alzheimer's disease are the leading causes of death in the U.S. - and they have a lot in common. Finding Some Calm After Living With ‘the Shakes’ By JANE E. BRODY An estimated 10 million people suffer with essential tremor, often for decades without knowing what is wrong. The Claim: C.L.A. Supplements Can Help You Lose Weight It can be found in health food stores all over, but is conjugated linoleic acid all it’s cracked up to be? Jane Brody, "Personal Health" columnist, discusses the latest health news. At Risk: Where Smokers Congregate Outside Bars, a Cloud Hovers Preliminary findings suggest that outdoor secondhand smoke could constitute a health risk. More Vital Signs Columns » ‘Sicko,’ Castro and the ‘120 Years Club’ “Sicko” savages the American health care system and extols Cuba’s system as the neatest thing since the white linen guayabera. A user's guide to diagnostic tests. What you need to know about procedures and diagnoses for six major diseases. Go to Special Section » News from AP &#x00bb; TB Patient ID'd As Atlanta Attorney, 31 Swiss Ask Novartis to Withdraw Drug FDA Nixes Fast Track for Cancer Vaccine Cancer Expected to Skyrocket in Asia CDC Seeks Those Who Sat Near TB Patient US Probes How TB Traveler Crossed Border Browse All Health Topics Select a Health Topic Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis (ALS) Dietary Supplements and Herbal Remedies Food Contamination and Poisoning Human Papilloma Virus (HPV) Mental Health and Disorders Post Traumatic Stress Disorder SARS (Severe Acute Respiratory Syndrome) Seasonal Affective Disorder (SAD) Sexually Transmitted Diseases (STDs) Sudden Infant Death Syndrome Suicides and Suicide Attempts Health & Fitness Tools What's your score? » Calorie Calculator for Goal Weight What's your limit? » MOST POPULAR - HEALTH Lost Chances for Survival, Before and After Stroke Books: The Brain: Malleable, Capable, Vulnerable Personal Health: Finding Some Calm After Living With &#8216;the Shakes&#8217; For the Tiniest Babies, the Closest Thing to a Cocoon This Is Your Life (and How You Tell It) Lens Solution Is Pulled Over Link to Infection Vital Signs: Responses: In Study of Men, Lots of Coffee Appears to Lower Risk of Gout Six Killers: Heart Disease: Lessons of Heart Disease, Learned and Ignored Genes Take Charge, and Diets Fall by the Wayside What You Should Know: Steps Toward Reducing Risk Solution Is Pulled Over Link to Infection Lost Chances for Survival Start Even Before a Stroke 2 Flights Carried Man With Deadly TB For the Tiniest Babies, the Closest Thing to a Cocoon The Brain: Malleable, Capable, Vulnerable Tod H. Mikuriya, 73, Dies; Backed Medical Marijuana you need to know about heart disease Hip resurfacing: is it right for you? The changing attitudes towards "chemo brain" Treating the awkward years What movie should you see? Get the latest business news Photos, fine art, books and more. Be Prepared. For Your Major Purchase. What’s new on Broadway? Start your 30-day free trial of Times Reader today. The
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/us/31tb.html Near Misses Allowed Man With Tuberculosis to Fly - Misses Allowed Man With Tuberculosis to Fly May 31, 2007 A series of “understandable” near misses accounted for a Georgia man’s odyssey to Europe in which he might have exposed fellow passengers on a series of commercial flights to an exceptionally dangerous form of , federal officials said yesterday. Skip to next paragraph Dr. Martin S. Cetron at a news conference in Atlanta Wednesday. Back Story With The Times&#146;s Anahad O’Connor ( TB Patient Is Isolated After Taking Two Flights The man is being detained under a federal isolation order in an Atlanta hospital for treatment of extremely resistant tuberculosis, which is often lethal. American officials and those in many other countries, meanwhile, are seeking to advise more than 100 passengers who sat closest to him on the longest flights and crew members to infection. Health officials are also offering testing to hundreds of other passengers on the flights. It was the first airline-contact tracing investigation for extremely drug-resistant tuberculosis, and it exposed many flaws that need to be fixed for future episodes, officials of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention said at a news conference in Atlanta. While many infectious-disease experts and ethicists supported the agency’s action, at least one strongly criticized it as over-reacting. Among the problems the agency identified were dealing with time zone differences; a lack of coordination between American and international authorities concerning how to medically isolate the man while he was abroad; and how to speed the retrieval of passenger manifests from airlines. The episode also raised questions about how rapidly health officials could respond to a similar emergency with other deadly infectious diseases. Even after the news conference, many other questions remained unanswered, including why it took health officials in Georgia so long to try to deliver a letter that explicitly told the man, whose identity was not disclosed, not to fly abroad for his honeymoon. In an interview published yesterday in The Atlanta Journal-Constitution, the man disputed statements from disease agency officials about warnings it said Fulton County officials gave him about flying abroad. The agency said he was told not to fly. The man told the paper that Fulton County health officials said they “preferred” that he not go abroad for his honeymoon and did not advise him to take any precautions. “There are different perspectives on who said what to whom when,” said Dr. Martin S. Cetron, who directs agency’s division of global migration and quarantine. “It is very unfortunate that this whole situation wasn’t prevented” before the man flew with 432 other passengers and 18 crew members to Paris from Atlanta on Air France 385 on May 12, Dr. Cetron said. He took at least five flights within Europe and then flew with 190 other passengers and nine crew members from Prague to Montreal on Czech Air 104 on May 25. The Fulton County health department in Atlanta met with the man and his family on May 10, two days before he flew to Paris, and told them that he should not travel because he had multi-resistant tuberculosis, the disease agency said. No legal order was issued at the time, Dr. Cetron said in referring further questions to the Fulton County health department. Calls to the Fulton County health department yesterday were not returned. The extraordinary dangerous form of the tuberculosis was not detected until May 22, while he was in Europe. Dr. Cetron said that an agency officer telephoned the man in Rome and explicitly told him not to fly on a commercial plane — doctors believe prolonged exposure is needed to spread tuberculosis — while the agency worked out options to bring him back to the United States. They included an air ambulance. By the time a former disease agency doctor, who is working in Rome, arrived at the man’s hotel, the couple had left, Dr. Cetron said. The agency was in the process of putting the man’s name on a no-fly list. But by this time he had cut short his honeymoon that was supposed to last into June and was landing in Montreal. The efforts “weren’t fast enough,” Dr. Cetron said, adding that “we certainly will be learning lessons and looking to improve” current systems. The man drove to the United States and somewhere between Albany and New York spoke with Dr. Cetron, who instructed him on how to continue to Bellevue Hospital in Manhattan. There, he was isolated for 72 hours until the disease agency flew him in its plane to Atlanta on Monday. The man told the Atlanta paper that tuberculosis was detected by accident when he had a chest X-ray in January for another undisclosed problem. More Articles in National Patient Is Isolated After Taking Two Flights TB Declines, but Not in Immigrants Tuberculosis Cases Prompt Warning on Raw-Milk Cheese Infections in Newly Freed Inmates Are a Rising Concern Centers for Disease Control and Prevention More Articles in National &#x00bb; $15 million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: U.S. Virgin Islands Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the Grand Palais The
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/health/31aids.html?ex=1338264000&en=c24a10b9dbe2bec9&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Center - Health & Behavior Center May 31, 2007 JOHANNESBURG, May 30 &#151; The on Wednesday advised health workers in countries hard hit by to urge every patient to rather than to simply offer tests in limited circumstances. That is a more aggressive approach than what is commonly taken now or has previously been approved by the health organization. Until now, the W.H.O. and the AIDS agency had advised health workers in areas where H.I.V. is prevalent to offer tests if treatment is available, but not to recommend a test to every patient. Quite often, health workers administer a test only if the patient actively seeks one. The shift in strategy is born out of a stark reality, officials said: two decades into the AIDS epidemic, about four out of five people who are infected in low- to middle-income nations do not know that they carry H.I.V., the virus that causes AIDS. In sub-Saharan Africa, where the epidemic is centered, nearly 20 million people do not know they are infected, officials estimate. Their ignorance is costly. Those who do not know they are infected are more likely to infect others and less likely to seek early treatment, experts said. That means it costs more and takes more effort to save them with antiretroviral drugs. To curb the epidemic&#8217;s spread, &#8220;an H.I.V. diagnosis is an essential first step,&#8221; Kevin De Cock, head of the H.I.V.-AIDS division of the health organization, said during a telephone news conference. Evidence of the value of routine H.I.V. testing in nations swept by AIDS has been mounting for at least three years. In January 2004, Botswana&#8217;s government ordered its health care workers to recommend an H.I.V. test to every patient who showed up at a clinic or hospital, regardless of why he or she sought treatment. Testing rates skyrocketed. Zambia, Malawi, Kenya and Uganda now have similar policies. &#8220;The Botswana experience taught us that people want to be cared for, that they would like medical intervention&#8221; said Dr. Ernest Darkoh, who ran Botswana&#8217;s AIDS treatment program in 2004. Many patients were actually relieved when a health care worker urged them to take an H.I.V. test, he said, because it lifted some of the burden of a scary decision. Still, some human rights advocates have argued that because of the stigma of AIDS, no one should be pushed to take a test that could lead to the loss of their employment or abandonment by their families. Wednesday&#8217;s announcement, some AIDS experts said, strikes a balance between individual rights and the demands of a public health emergency. While tests must continue to be voluntary and confidential, they said, health care workers must advocate them as a standard part of medical care in countries with pervasive epidemics. &#8220;I believe these guidelines are long, long overdue and require rapid implementation,&#8221; said Zachie Achmat, a leading AIDS activist in South Africa. &#8220;It would be entirely substandard medical practice not to recommend that any person in a high-burden country While health organizations and United Nations AIDS program have been stressing the importance of widespread H.I.V. testing for years, Dr. De Cock said earlier guidelines were too ambiguous. &#8220;You could legitimately ask, &#8216;Have we used H.I.V. testing in the most imaginative and beneficial way?&#8217; &#8221; he said. &#8220;I think we feel that, somehow, let&#8217;s get serious and do this right.&#8221; The new guidelines state that unless the patient specifically refuses one, an H.I.V. test should be performed if the patient&#8217;s symptoms or medical histories suggest infection. That would include the children of infected mothers and anyone with . More broadly, the guidelines state that in any nation where more than one percent of pregnant women have H.I.V., every patient who shows up at a clinic or hospital should be tested, regardless of symptoms. That would cover a swath of sub-Saharan African countries. Dr. De Cock said that the cost of expanding testing is minor compared with the overall cost of AIDS prevention and treatment. But he said that the new policy would likely depend on hiring and training more low-level health care workers because there are far too few doctors or nurses in low-income countries to handle the task. of 14) Sell; Preventing H.I.V., but at What Price? Mayor Doubtful About Government's Role in Anti-AIDS Circumcision Plan W.H.O. Urges Circumcision To Reduce Spread of AIDS Circumcision's Anti-AIDS Effect Found Greater Than First Thought Acquired Immune Deficiency Syndrome of 14) &#x00bb; De Gustibus: Don&#8217;t Point That Menu at My Child, Please Basic Training: Modern Marathoners Have Fewer Miles on Them Design That Solves Problems for the World&#8217;s Poor Big Disparities in Judging of Asylum Cases Fighting the Tide, a Few Restaurants Tilt to Tap Water Op-Ed Contributor: Contributor: Physician, Upgrade Thyself Restaurants: Go, Eat, You Never Know Supreme Court Memo: Oral Dissents Give Ginsburg a New Voice on Court Comedy Business Turns to the Web Fault Harsh Methods in Interrogation Truth, Fiction and Lou Dobbs Lawmakers Deal Said to Bring U.S. Scrutiny Iraqi Refugees, in Dire Straits, Turn to the Sex Trade in Syria Giuliani Tempers Tough Image on Campaign Justices' Ruling Limits Suits on Pay Disparity Hitherto Staunch G.O.P. Voters Souring on Iraq you need to know about heart disease Hip resurfacing: is it right for you? The changing attitudes towards "chemo brain" Treating the awkward years Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the Grand Palais The
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/washington/31fda.html?ex=1338264000&en=2a9f790bc4b8a6b8&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss F.D.A. Still Unsettled in Wake of New Questions - Still Unsettled in Wake of New Questions May 31, 2007 ROCKVILLE, Md., May 30 &#151; When Dr. Andrew C. von Eschenbach took over the Food and Drug Administration in 2005, the agency had a crisis over drug approvals that had missed or ignored dangerous side effects in Vioxx, antidepressants and other prominent medications. improvements, and agency officials said they would no longer be caught flatfooted on drug safety. But this month, The New England Journal of Medicine published a study suggesting that a major pill, Avandia, might increase the risk of heart attacks. Concerns over that drug and others have led and Democrats in the House and the Senate to call for investigations. A House hearing is planned for June 6. in a briefing on Wednesday that his agency needed to collaborate more closely with drug companies. &#8220;The point is that we need to look at the role of the F.D.A. in being a bridge to the future, not a barrier to the future,&#8221; he said at his office here. Responding to a suggestion that promoting collaborations with drug makers, including an effort to modernize human testing and find genetic markers to predict suffering from side effects, may not be politic, the agency was not working solely with pharmaceutical companies. &#8220;It&#8217;s with everyone,&#8221; including government agencies and independent scientists, he said. He defended the agency in the Avandia case, saying, &#8220;I believe we did it right with regard to Avandia.&#8221; Hints of the heart risks from Avandia were, however, present from the beginning. The original trials, overseen by , the drug&#8217;s maker, showed that patients taking the drug had more than twice the rate of ischemic as recipients of placebos. The medical reviewer for the F.D.A. expressed concerns, but in a further analysis decided that it was less of a problem. The hearing next week may highlight the growing internal dissension between officials who approve drugs and those who track the safety of drugs after they have been approval. Tension between the groups has long been common, but in recent months it has erupted into sniping. Congressional investigators said the safety group recommended months ago that the drug agency put its severest warning on Avandia. The review group, which holds sway, has not done so. The sniping became public in an exchange at an advisory committee hearing last month on whether to approve a new On one side was Dr. David Graham, author of an internal report that found that Avandia substantially increased the risks of heart attack, findings similar to the medical journal&#8217;s report. On the other, Dr. Robert J. Meyer, an office director in the drug review division, and his boss, Dr. John Jenkins, were in a group deciding against warning about the potential risks. There was little chance that the advisory committee or the drug agency would approve the arthritis drug, Arcoxia, at the hearing. Behind the scenes, agency officials were battling over Avandia. Dr. Graham told the committee that top agency officials had demanded an unreasonable level of certainty about a drug&#8217;s risks before agreeing to warn the public. &#8220;They assume it&#8217;s safe,&#8221; Dr. Graham said of the top officials&#8217; analyses of safety data. &#8220;Which is just looking at things all the way wrong.&#8221; Dr. Jenkins said Dr. Graham&#8217;s &#8220;characterization of how we look at safety data is simply false.&#8221; &#8220;We make our best informed judgment about what the regulatory action should be,&#8221; Dr. Jenkins added. , Republican of Iowa, and others on Capitol Hill, say the rift between the approval office and the safety office means that the two must separate and that the safety group must have more power. Mr. Grassley proposed such a split in an amendment this month; it failed by one vote. Top House staff members said the Avandia case had breathed new life into Mr. Grassley&#8217;s proposal, because the House will soon debate changing the drug agency. Curt Furberg, a professor of public health sciences at Wake Forest and a co-author of the New England Journal of Medicine&#8217;s editorial on Avandia, said the agency remained broken. &#8220;Safety is just not a high priority for them,&#8221; said Dr. Furberg, who serves on the F.D.A. Drug Safety and Risk Management Advisory Committee. the agency intended to warn patients rapidly when it received information that a drug might be unsafe. He added that the agency had to find a way to ensure that patients did not overreact to uncertain safety problems. More Articles in Washington Says F.D.A. Was Lax on Label for Avandia Years Ago, Agency Was Warned of a Drug&#8217;s Risks Agency Approves a Birth Control Pill Halting Periods Indefinitely For Drug Makers, a Downside to Full Disclosure Food and Drug Administration von Eschenbach, Andrew C More Articles in Washington &#x00bb; De Gustibus: Don&#8217;t Point That Menu at My Child, Please Basic Training: Modern Marathoners Have Fewer Miles on Them Design That Solves Problems for the World&#8217;s Poor Big Disparities in Judging of Asylum Cases Fighting the Tide, a Few Restaurants Tilt to Tap Water Op-Ed Contributor: Contributor: Physician, Upgrade Thyself Restaurants: Go, Eat, You Never Know Supreme Court Memo: Oral Dissents Give Ginsburg a New Voice on Court Comedy Business Turns to the Web Fault Harsh Methods in Interrogation Truth, Fiction and Lou Dobbs Lawmakers Deal Said to Bring U.S. Scrutiny Iraqi Refugees, in Dire Straits, Turn to the Sex Trade in Syria Giuliani Tempers Tough Image on Campaign Justices' Ruling Limits Suits on Pay Disparity Hitherto Staunch G.O.P. Voters Souring on Iraq million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: U.S. Virgin Islands Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the Grand Palais The
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/washington/31prexy.html?ex=1338264000&en=b10f448e0d045d5b&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss Bush Requests $30 Billion to Fight AIDS - Requests $30 Billion to Fight AIDS May 31, 2007 WASHINGTON, May 30 — President Bush called Wednesday for Congress to spend $30 billion to fight global over the next five years, a near doubling of financing that is part of a White House effort to burnish Mr. Bush’s humanitarian credentials before he meets leaders of the industrialized nations next week. Skip to next paragraph Doug Mills/The Bush with Baron Mosima Loyiso Tantoh, 4, and his mother, Manyongo Mosima Tantoh, who is H.I.V. positive. Bush's Proposal for AIDS Program Center The initiative, if approved, would build on a program that grew out of the president’s 2003 State of the Union address, when he asked for $15 billion over five years for prevention, treatment and care of AIDS patients in developing countries. Congress approved more than $18 billion, but the program is set to expire next year. Mr. Bush’s announcement, delivered in the White House Rose Garden, adds to what has become an unexpectedly high priority for the White House. AIDS was not a signature issue for Mr. Bush when he ran for office in 2000. But it has become one in part because the Christian conservatives who make up his political base have embraced it, and in part because Mr. Bush wants to build a legacy for the United States and a more compassionate image abroad to counter international criticism of American policies in the wake of the Sept. 11, 2001, attacks. That sentiment was reflected in Mr. Bush’s remarks on Wednesday. “Once again, the generosity of the American people is one of the great untold stories of our time,” he said. “Our citizens are offering comfort to millions who suffer, and restoring hope to those who feel forsaken.” AIDS advocacy organizations praised Mr. Bush for proposing the additional money, but said the plan — which he said would provide drugs for 2.5 million patients — did not go nearly far enough toward meeting the international community’s stated goal of treating the estimated 10 million patients in developing nations. “It’s a modest increase, it’s important that he reaffirmed it, but we will need the next president to do more,” said Paul Zeitz, executive director of the Global AIDS Alliance, a nonprofit advocacy group. “We’re not getting ahead of the AIDS crisis. We’re tempering it.” Administration officials concede that point and say the White House is hoping Mr. Bush’s announcement will prod other Group of 8 countries, as well as nations that have growing economies, to make spending commitments of their own. “The goal of universal access isn’t a United States goal, it’s a global goal,” said Mark R. Dybul, the administration’s global AIDS coordinator. “The rest of the world is going to need to respond if we are going to achieve these goals.” International development and human rights issues will be high on the agenda of next week’s summit, but so will — an issue on which Mr. Bush finds himself at odds with his fellow Group of 8 leaders, notably the meeting’s host, Chancellor Angela Merkel of Germany. Dan Bartlett, counselor to Mr. Bush, said the president intended to address climate change in a speech on Thursday at the United States Agency for International Development. But so far this week, Mr. Bush has been devoting most of his attention to human rights and poverty, issues that draw him less criticism than his stance on climate change. In an interview Monday night, a senior administration official said Mr. Bush planned to spend the week in advance of the Group of 8 conference spotlighting humanitarian issues and “demonstrating U.S. leadership around the world.” On Tuesday, Mr. Bush announced he was imposing stiff economic sanctions on Sudan to press its government into cooperating with a peacekeeping force that is trying to end the violence in Darfur. On Wednesday, in addition to the AIDS announcement, Mr. Bush named , his former trade representative, as his candidate to head the , calling the nominee “a committed internationalist” who “wants to help struggling nations defeat poverty.” In Thursday’s speech, Mr. Bush also intends to talk about education programs in the developing world, and his initiative to combat The AIDS initiative, which is likely to generate bipartisan support in Congress, would cover federal spending for the 2009 to 2013 fiscal years, meaning the vast majority of the money would be spent after Mr. Bush left office. To promote it, the White House is sending to Africa next month. “She and I share a passion,” Mr. Bush said. “We believe that to whom much is given, much is required.” The United Nations reports that there are nearly 40 million people worldwide living with H.I.V., the virus that causes AIDS; last year three million died from their infections. In his announcement in 2003, Mr. Bush said he was committed to offering treatment for two million H.I.V. patients by 2008. But so far, he said, the program, called the President’s Emergency Plan for AIDS Relief, has paid for treatment for just 1.1 million people in 15 nations. Advocates complain that the new goal, bringing the number of patients treated to 2.5 million, is not that much more ambitious than the old one. “By 2013 there will be 12 million people that urgently need medicines,” Mr. Zeitz said. The White House, however, said that in addition to providing treatment for 2.5 million, the new money would prevent 12 million new infections and provide care for more than 12 million people. Mr. Bartlett said the president was convinced America’s image in the world would improve because of it. “I’ve heard him talk about this is a part of America that gets overlooked,” he said, “and that over time, people will look back and say, ‘At a point in time where America may have been under scrutiny for other reasons, look at the significant contribution they have made. They saved more lives than anybody could have imagined.’ ” More Articles in Washington Finds Bush's AIDS Effort Limited by Restrictions Circumcision's Anti-AIDS Effect Found Greater Than First Thought Bush Gets Aid Of Democrats In Fighting Pandemics Cheap Solutions Cut AIDS Toll for Poor Kenyan Youths Acquired Immune Deficiency Syndrome Third World and Developing Countries More Articles in Washington &#x00bb; De Gustibus: Don&#8217;t Point That Menu at My Child, Please Basic Training: Modern Marathoners Have Fewer Miles on Them Design That Solves Problems for the World&#8217;s Poor Big Disparities in Judging of Asylum Cases Fighting the Tide, a Few Restaurants Tilt to Tap Water Op-Ed Contributor: Contributor: Physician, Upgrade Thyself Restaurants: Go, Eat, You Never Know Supreme Court Memo: Oral Dissents Give Ginsburg a New Voice on Court Comedy Business Turns to the Web Fault Harsh Methods in Interrogation Truth, Fiction and Lou Dobbs Lawmakers Deal Said to Bring U.S. Scrutiny Iraqi Refugees, in Dire Straits, Turn to the Sex Trade in Syria Giuliani Tempers Tough Image on Campaign Justices' Ruling Limits Suits on Pay Disparity Hitherto Staunch G.O.P. Voters Souring on Iraq million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: U.S. Virgin Islands Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the Grand Palais The
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/05/31/fashion/31Physical.html?ex=1338264000&en=06f577ca9763c474&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss For Those Who Sweat, Some Small Stuff - Those Who Sweat, Some Small Stuff SARAH BOWEN SHEA Published: May 31, 2007 To stay hydrated, athletes must replace electrolytes like sodium and potassium that are lost in sweat. But many triathletes and runners prefer to eat their carbohydrates (like chewy bars) instead of gulping Gatorade or Cytomax, carb-loaded drinks with a hint of electrolytes. This long-distance set now has a new option that leaves carbohydrates out of the equation: electrolyte-drink tablets. Skip to next paragraph Tony Cenicola/The tablets offer athletes a new option for electrolytes. Basic Training: Modern Marathoners Have Fewer Miles on Them Don’t Be So Quick to Hit the Road, One Program Says Tony Cenicola/The makers figure athletes already eat enough energy bars and gels to meet the roughly 80-gram limit that their bodies can shuttle to their muscles in an hour. “These tablets are catching on among triathletes,” said Duane Franks, a San Francisco-based coach of endurance athletes. “Sports drinks often don’t have enough electrolytes in them.” Carbohydrates can be tough for some to stomach midrace, so electrolyte-only drinks are marketed as easy to digest. But our tester, Deborah Shulman, a sports nutritionist in Bellvue, Colo., had stomach upset with half the brands she tried on bike rides of two to three hours. During breaks, Dr. Shulman, who has a Ph.D. in physiology, refilled her water bottles and popped in tablets that fizz like Alka-Seltzer (no stirring needed). NUUN PORTABLE ELECTROLYTE HYDRATION $19.50 for three 12-tablet tubes, www.nuun.com. Dr. Shulman liked the new Kona Kola best of the four flavors, but said, in all, "the salt was quite apparent." She had "brief stomach upset after drinking Nuun, but it would quickly dissipate" and it didn't interfere with her workouts. After cycling, she was "less dehydrated than" she was with other tablets, possibly because Nuun has the highest sodium and potassium levels. $9.95 for 12-tablet tube, www.rei.com. Introduced in April, Elixir has "excellent digestibility." It didn't give Dr. Shulman the "stomach lurch" she got with Nuun and Zym. Its lemon-lime flavor "was the lightest and most pleasant" of all those tested, and Dr. Shulman liked how it "remained light as the liquid got warmer" during a ride, instead of becoming saltier, as the Nuun did. Elixir dissolved the fastest — in 90 seconds. ZYM PORTABLE ELECTROLYTE DRINK $23.49 for three 10-tablet tubes, www.gozym.com. Zym tablets were Dr. Shulman's least favorite. They left her mouth feeling "coated with thick spit" and also gave her "some stomach upset every time." (She suspected magnesium was the culprit.) Zym did, however, keep her "well hydrated," but Dr. Shulman thought the six added vitamins and four electrolytes were "an overkill of ingredients." & Style (8 of 9) of Lance's Slipstream, A Trainer Reinvents Himself When Being Varsity-Fit Masks an Eating Disorder PHYSICAL CULTURE; Putting the Gym Back In Gym Class New Breed of Trainers Are Proving Fat Is Fit & Style (8 of 9) &#x00bb; De Gustibus: Don&#8217;t Point That Menu at My Child, Please Basic Training: Modern Marathoners Have Fewer Miles on Them Design That Solves Problems for the World&#8217;s Poor Big Disparities in Judging of Asylum Cases Fighting the Tide, a Few Restaurants Tilt to Tap Water Op-Ed Contributor: Contributor: Physician, Upgrade Thyself Restaurants: Go, Eat, You Never Know Supreme Court Memo: Oral Dissents Give Ginsburg a New Voice on Court Comedy Business Turns to the Web Fault Harsh Methods in Interrogation Truth, Fiction and Lou Dobbs Lawmakers Deal Said to Bring U.S. Scrutiny Iraqi Refugees, in Dire Straits, Turn to the Sex Trade in Syria Giuliani Tempers Tough Image on Campaign Justices' Ruling Limits Suits on Pay Disparity Hitherto Staunch G.O.P. Voters Souring on Iraq million dollar homes in Florida, Wyoming and California Also in Real Estate: U.S. Virgin Islands Make your wedding a day to remember In the Weddings Directory: View All Paid Announcements Search Vendors & Services Post Your Paid Announcement Home & Garden &#x00bb; Art & Design &#x00bb; Sarkozys: The French Kennedys? Phil Spector’s Long and Winding Road The Dirty Water Underground An Animated Film by Jeff Scher Artist Sets Up House(s) at the Grand Palais The
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/03/weekinreview/03harm.html?ex=1338523200&en=aa0ccf5c14b312cf&ei=5088&partner=rssnyt&emc=rss 6 Billion Bits of Data About Me, Me, Me! - Billion Bits of Data About Me, Me, Me! June 3, 2007 JAMES D. WATSON, who helped crack the code half a century ago, last week became the first person handed the full text of his own DNA on a small computer disk. But he won’t be the last. Skip to next paragraph John Dunn for The D. Watson (is there a gene for left-handedness?) last year in Cold Spring Harbor, N.Y. Soon enough, scientists say, we will all be able to decipher our own genomes — the six billion letters of genetic code containing the complete inventory of the traits we inherited from our parents — for as little as $1,000. Just what we will do with the essence of who we are once we bottle it, however, is likely to be as much a social experiment as a scientific one. As thousands of people decode their DNA over the next few years, they are likely to find themselves facing a genetic mirror whose reflection changes on an almost daily basis. The more genomes that scientists have to work with, the more they can learn about them. So staying on top of your own health outlook may begin to resemble checking the performance of your stock portfolio. One day you find you have a gene that puts you at risk for ; the next it’s one that may make you live longer. “Nobody quite knows how to manage expectations in such a rapidly changing and deeply personal field,” said George M. Church, a Harvard Medical School geneticist who directs the Personal Genome Project. “The picture is getting more and more complete, but along the way there’s going to be a lot of, ‘You told us this last week and now you’re telling us this!’ ” By the end of the summer, Dr. Church’s research project promises to deliver sequences to its first 10 volunteers. Unlike Dr. Watson, whose complete genome cost $1 million, the project’s volunteers will receive the one percent of their genome currently deemed most useful at a cost of $1,000. One start-up company, 23andme, recently announced plans to provide affordable chunks of their DNA to individual consumers, along with tools to help them keep track of and understand their genetic information. And technology companies like Illumina, Applied Biosystems and 454 Life Sciences, which solicited Dr. Watson’s DNA to prove its abilities, say the price of a complete human genome has already dropped to $100,000. They are competing for a $10 million “X prize” to sequence 100 human genomes within 10 days. (Dr. Watson’s took about two months.) Those who have signed up to be sequenced as part of the competition include , co-founder of Microsoft; the astrophysicist Stephen Hawking; the television interviewer Larry King; and the financier “It’s the start of an era of comparative individual genomics,” said , who as president of the Celera Corporation sequenced much of his own genome in 2000 and recently completed it. “Hopefully we’ll have tens of thousands to compare in the next year or two.” Dr. Venter said he consulted his genetic profile every time a new announcement of a gene discovery came out. Just last month, having read a report in this newspaper about a gene that raises the risk of , he found that he indeed carried the mutation. He might have guessed that from his family history, but knowing his individual risk, rather than a statistical average, is a stronger motivator to change, Dr. Venter said. Because of another risk gene he carries for heart disease, he altered his and has been taking a -lowering drug for several years. “Now we can do something to alter what might have been our genetic destiny,” he added. Beyond heart disease, there are a growing number of genes already known to influence predispositions to common diseases like breast and colon , depression and dementia. There are other reasons to unravel your genome. Embracers of nature over nurture may sift through their 20,000 genes to find an explanation for personality traits thought to have a partial genetic basis — like early rising, risk-taking, shyness and addiction. And the curiosity is unlikely to be restricted to our own genetic code. A generation of personally motivated amateur geneticists may seek out others who have similar traits and similar quirks in their genetic code, hoping to deduce a connection. Friends and families, too, may begin to compare notes. “You can imagine a family who won’t let someone marry their daughter until they examined her prospective husband’s genome,” Dr. Watson suggested at a news conference on Thursday. “You’ll want to know what your mate is going to have.” The mate, of course, may not want to know himself. Dr. Watson told the company that sequenced his genome not to reveal to him the status of one gene known to predispose people to disease. “Who wants to know that?” he said. But Dr. Watson, 79, may yet learn that his genome contains Alzheimer’s risk genes that may be discovered tomorrow or next month or next year. On the other hand, he may find that he carries genes that offset the risk. Or both. Moreover, because the way genes influence health and behavior depends heavily on their interaction with the environment, what our genome can tell us may change depending on lifestyle choices. People who learn they carry a higher genetic risk of Type II diabetes, for instance, may see that risk increase if they start to gain weight. A gene that makes it difficult for some people to sweat in extreme heat might not matter to you if you live in Seattle. But if you are thinking of moving to Miami, knowing it exists in your genome could prove useful. The lack of established medical authorities to interpret or filter such information could cause deep discomfort, some experts caution. And the technology is quickly outpacing social debate over how it should be handled. “Some people are going to have information that they don’t know what to do with,” said Angela Trepanier, president elect of the National Society of Genetic Counselors. “And that can do more harm than good.” Still, the early boosters of the personal genome say the best bet for improving individual health care is not only to embrace genetic knowledge about ourselves, but to share it with others. If hundreds of thousands of people make their genomes public — along with personal information about their ancestry, their health history, what they look like, what they do and where they live — they argue, scientists will finally be able to draw meaningful correlations between variations in DNA sequence and any trait that has even a partial genetic basis, from what drugs we should take to what foods we like to eat. As that happens, everyone with a sequenced genome will learn how the new findings affect them. “Let’s sequence prominent Texans,” Dr. Watson said at the press conference in Houston last week. “What we really want now is a lot of data.” Until then, even Dr. Watson, who posted his genome on the Internet last week, has to wait. At a ceremony marking the occasion, he stared at the disk containing his genome for a few seconds, then stuck it in his pocket. in Review (5 of 11) of DNA Discoverer Is Deciphered Genome Researchers Find New Indicators of Breast Cancer Risk Prenatal Test Puts Down Syndrome in Hard Focus FINDINGS; A Renowned Bachelor, And a Search For a Mate in Review (5 of 11) &#x00bb; When Should a Kid Start Kindergarten? Your Money: More Advice Graduates Don&#8217;t Want to Hear The Other Machu Picchu Surge in Adoptions Raises Concern in Ethiopia 36 Hours in Florence Survey: Read Any Good Books Lately? Editorial: Dick Cheney Rules Choice Tables | Barcelona: Five Catalan Stars, With Small Plates and Long Menus The Superfabulous World of Rufus Wainwright Fingers That Keep the Most Treasured Violins Fit Go to Complete List » Commanders Say Push in Baghdad Is Short of Goal For Pornographers, Internet's Virtues Turn to Vices Papers Portray Plot as More Talk Than Action Iraq's Curse: A Thirst for Final, Crushing Victory Fever Builds for iPhone (Anxiety Too) Bush's Push on Immigration Tests His Base The Democrats' Second 2008 Presidential Debate 4 Accused of Plot to Blow Up Facilities at Kennedy Airport U.S. Not Pushing for Attack on Iran, Rice Says Go to Complete List » Go to Complete List » Follow the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/health/04fertility.html At-Home Fertility Screening Available for Men - Health & Behavior At-Home Fertility Screening Available for Men RONI CARYN RABIN Published: June 4, 2007 Many men, faced with the prospect of going to the doctor for a evaluation, will tell you: they would rather just stay home. A new at-home screening test, called Fertell, lets couples find out if they have fertility problems without stepping into a doctor’s office. The test has his and hers components — a screening test for men that is the first at-home device to measure the concentration of motile sperm, and a test for women that measures a hormone considered a marker of egg quality. The availability of the two-in-one test helps drive home the message that both men and women can contribute to infertility, experts say. “It takes two to have a baby, as silly as that sounds,” said Dr. Harry Fisch, director of the Male Reproductive Center at New York-Presbyterian Hospital/Columbia University Medical Center, who does not have a financial relationship with the maker of the test, Genosis Inc. The test results could give couples early warning that they should see a doctor, Dr. Fisch said. “Couples often don’t appreciate this,” he said. “So many times the woman goes through all these tests, and the guy doesn’t even have a semen analysis.” The test for the male requires a semen sample; it assesses the ability of sperm to swim through a solution similar to cervical mucus, as well as the number able to do so, said Dr. Keith B. Isaacson, an associate professor of obstetrics, gynecology and reproductive biology at Harvard Medical School who is on the board of medical advisers at Genosis. Results are available in 80 minutes. The female fertility test is a urine stick, much like a home test, that measures the level of follicle stimulating hormone on the third day of the menstrual cycle. An abnormally high level is an indicator that the ovarian reserve, indicating egg quality, is low. The result is available in 30 minutes. The tests are not definitive and do not substitute for a thorough professional evaluation. They screen for main problems, experts say, but will not pick up all fertility-related difficulties. About one million American women seek medical help for fertility-related troubles each year, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention . The problem lies with the woman 40 percent of the time, with the man 40 percent of the time, and with both 20 percent of the time, experts say. “Most people are surprised to hear that almost 50 percent of the time, it’s a male factor,” Dr. Isaacson said. But, he added, women are still more likely to initiate treatment. “My guess is the female partner is the one who’s going to buy this and encourage the guy to use it.” Fertell, which has been approved by the Food and Drug Administration , goes on sale today. No prescription is necessary, and it is expected to cost around $100. of 22) OPINION; As the Use of Donor Sperm Increases, Secrecy Can Be a Health Hazard Screening for Abnormal Embryos Offers Couples Hope After Heartbreak Driven by Costs, Fertility Clients Head Overseas 2 Labor Chiefs Laud McCall, But Don't Say 'Endorsement' of 22) &#x00bb; Follow the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky THE NEW YORK TIMES GUIDE TO ESSENTIAL KNOWLEDGE Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/health/04liver.html New Liver Cancer Drug Is Promising, Doctors Say - Health & Behavior New Liver Cancer Drug Is Promising, Doctors Say June 4, 2007 CHICAGO, June 3 — A new drug looks poised to become the first effective treatment for liver , one of the most common and deadliest cancers in the world and one whose incidence has been rising in the United States, doctors said here Sunday. Skip to next paragraph Cancer Experts Threatened After Opposing Drug In a large clinical trial, the drug, called Nexavar, extended the lives of patients by almost three months, or 44 percent. While that is far from a cure, experts say it represents a breakthrough after years of efforts to find a drug that works. “We did not have anything for these patients,” said Dr. Josep M. Llovet, one of the principal investigators in the trial. “Now we have an effective drug that prolongs survival.” Dr. Llovet, who has appointments at the Mount Sinai School of Medicine and the University of Barcelona, said there had been 100 unsuccessful trials of drugs for liver cancer in the last 30 years. Nexavar, also known as sorafenib, was developed by Onyx Pharmaceuticals, a California biotechnology company, and Bayer, the German pharmaceutical company. The companies said they would apply this summer for regulatory approval to sell Nexavar as a treatment for liver cancer. The drug is already approved as a treatment for kidney cancer, which means that doctors are allowed to prescribe it “off label” for patients with liver cancer. In the trial, patients who received Nexavar lived a median of 10.7 months, compared with 7.9 months for those who received a placebo. The main side effects were diarrhea and a painful syndrome in the hands and feet. The results are scheduled to be presented here on Monday at the annual meeting of the American Society of Clinical Oncology. The trial involved 602 patients with hepatocellular carcinoma, the most common form of liver cancer by far. Experts said the results would not apply to other forms of liver cancer or to cancers that originated elsewhere, such as in the lung or breast, and then spread to the liver. An improvement of survival of 2.8 months is considered significant for cancer drugs, given the difficulty of treating the disease. However, there has been rising concern among doctors, patients and insurers about the cost of adding a few months to life. Nexavar, like many other new cancer drugs, is expensive, costing $4,500 a month. Most cases of liver cancer occur in people who already have cirrhosis of the liver, a scarring of the organ that in turn can be caused by B or C, alcohol abuse, or . Liver cancer has been fairly uncommon in the United States, with about 19,000 new cases expected this year, with nearly 17,000 deaths. But the number of cases has been rising because of an increasing incidence of hepatitis C. And worldwide, there are about 600,000 new cases a year, making liver cancer one of the most common cancers and cancer deaths globally. That is mainly because of the large number of people in the Far East with hepatitis B and C. If liver cancer is diagnosed when the is confined to a small area of the liver, it can often be treated by surgically removing part of the liver. Liver transplants can cure the disease, though there is a shortage of donor organs. There are also some other localized treatments, like one that involves inserting particles into the liver artery to cut off the flow of blood to the tumor. For about half of all patients in the United States and Europe, however, the disease is not diagnosed until it is too late for any of those techniques to be useful, said Dr. Llovet, who is a consultant to Bayer. And many patients who are treated through surgery or another technique suffer a recurrence of cancer. Nexavar is one of a new generation of biotech drugs that has started to transform cancer treatment. Taken as four pills a day, the drug blocks both the blood supply to the tumor and also proteins in cancer cells that spur tumor growth. Outside experts said the drug represented a promising advance, but some cautioned that the patients in the trial had fairly healthy livers. “We don’t know yet whether this treatment will be as safe and effective in patients with more profoundly impaired liver function,” said Dr. Louis M. Weiner, a specialist in gastrointestinal tumors at the Fox Chase Cancer Center in Philadelphia. of 22) Cartilage, Not a Cancer Therapy Genome Researchers Find New Indicators of Breast Cancer Risk For One State, Soft Sell Eases Vaccine Fears PRO BASKETBALL; Fisher Is a Father First, And a Jazz Player Later of 22) &#x00bb; Follow the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/03/health/03docs.html After Sanctions, Doctors Get Drug Company Pay - Health & Behavior After Sanctions, Doctors Get Drug Company Pay June 3, 2007 A decade ago the Board of Medical Practice accused Dr. Faruk Abuzzahab of a “reckless, if not willful, disregard” for the welfare of 46 patients, 5 of whom died in his care or shortly afterward. The board suspended his license for seven months and restricted it for two years after that. Skip to next paragraph Money for Sanctioned Doctors A Battle With Depression and Suicidal Tendencies But Dr. Abuzzahab, a Minneapolis psychiatrist, is still overseeing the testing of drugs on patients and is being paid by pharmaceutical companies for the work. At least a dozen have paid him for research or marketing since he was disciplined. Medical ethicists have long argued that doctors who give experimental medicines should be chosen with care. Indeed, the drug industry’s own guidelines for clinical trials state, “Investigators are selected based on qualifications, training, research or clinical expertise in relevant fields.” Yet Dr. Abuzzahab is far from the only doctor to have been disciplined or criticized by a medical board but later paid by drug makers. An analysis of state records by The more than 100 such doctors in Minnesota, at least two with criminal fraud convictions. While Minnesota is the only state to make its records publicly available, the problem, experts say, is national. One of Dr. Abuzzahab’s patients was David Olson, whom the psychiatrist tried repeatedly to recruit for clinical trials. Drug makers paid Dr. Abuzzahab thousands of dollars for every patient he recruited. In July 1997, when Mr. Olson again refused to be a test subject, Dr. Abuzzahab discharged him from the hospital even though he was suicidal, records show. Mr. Olson committed In its disciplinary action against Dr. Abuzzahab, the state medical board referred to Mr. Olson as Patient No. 46. “Dr. Abuzzahab failed to appreciate the risks of taking Patient No. 46 off Clozaril, failed to respond appropriately to the patient’s rapid deterioration and virtually ignored this patient’s suicidality,” the board found. In an interview, Dr. Abuzzahab dismissed the findings as “without heft” and said drug makers were aware of his record. He said he had helped study many of the most popular drugs in psychiatry, including Paxil, Prozac, Risperdal, Seroquel, Zoloft and Zyprexa. The Times’s examination of Minnesota’s trove of records on drug company payments to doctors found that from 1997 to 2005, at least 103 doctors who had been disciplined or criticized by the state medical board received a total of $1.7 million from drug makers. The median payment over that period was $1,250; the largest was $479,000. The sanctions by the board ranged from reprimands to demands for retraining to suspension of licenses. Of those 103 doctors, 39 had been penalized for inappropriate prescribing practices, 21 for substance abuse, 12 for substandard care and 3 for mismanagement of drug studies. A few cases received national news media coverage, but drug makers hired the doctors anyway. The Times included in its analysis any doctor who received drug company payments within 10 years of being under medical board sanction. At least 38 doctors received a combined $140,000 while they were still under sanction. Dr. Abuzzahab received more than $55,000 from 1997 to 2005. Drug makers refused to comment, said they relied on doctors to report disciplinary or criminal cases, or said they were considering changing their hiring systems. Asked about the Minnesota analysis, the deputy commissioner and chief medical officer of the Food and Drug Administration , Dr. Janet Woodcock, said the federal government needed to overhaul regulations governing clinical trials and the doctors who oversaw them. “We recognize that we need to modernize the F.D.A. approach in keeping people safe in clinical trials,” Dr. Woodcock said. Drug makers are not required to inform the agency when they discover that investigators are falsifying data, and indeed some have failed to do so in the past. The F.D.A. plans to require such disclosures, Dr. Woodcock said. The agency inspects at most 1 percent of all clinical trials, she said. Karl Uhlendorf, a spokesman for the Pharmaceutical Research and Manufacturers of America, said the trade group would not comment on The Times’s findings. The records most likely understate the extent of the problem because they are incomplete. And the Minnesota Board of Medical Practice disciplines a smaller share of the state’s doctors than almost any other medical board in the country, according to rankings by , an advocacy group based in Washington. Dr. David Rothman, president of the Institute on Medicine as a Profession at , said the Times analysis revealed a national problem. “There’s no reason to think Minnesota is unique,” Dr. Rothman said. “Clinical trial investigators must be culled from only the finest physicians in the country,” he said, “since they work on the frontiers of new knowledge. That drug makers are scraping the bottom of the medical barrel is an outrage.” of 22) Maker Guilty of Deceit Over Marketing DOCTORS REAPING MILLIONS FOR USE OF ANEMIA DRUGS Prescription-Writing Law Is Voided Court Strikes Law Barring Sale of Drug Data of 22) &#x00bb; Follow the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky THE NEW YORK TIMES GUIDE TO ESSENTIAL KNOWLEDGE Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/04/health/04drug.html Cancer Experts Threatened After Opposing Drug - Health & Behavior Cancer Experts Threatened After Opposing Drug THE NEW YORK TIMES Published: June 4, 2007 CHICAGO, June 3 — Two prominent prostate experts have been threatened for opposing approval of a controversial new drug and are being protected by bodyguards as they attend the nation’s largest cancer conference here. The experts, Dr. Howard Scher of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center and Dr. Maha Hussain of the , received e-mail and other threats, according to spokeswomen for Sloan-Kettering and for the cancer conference. It is not known who sent the threats. However, it is clear that the doctors’ public stance against the drug, Provenge, has inflamed the passions of some men with prostate cancer and patient advocates, who say the drug would offer hope to desperate patients with few or no alternatives. Many investors also have made big bets on the stock of the drug’s developer, Dendreon, a Seattle biotechnology company, whose stock has fluctuated wildly along with the prospects for the drug. Some investors stood to profit if the drug was approved, and others if it was rejected. Food and Drug Administration said in May that it would not approve Provenge without more evidence that it was safe and effective. Patients with incurable diseases often advocate for approval of new drugs even if the data supporting them are not perfect. But threats to people with opposing views to take such advocacy to a new level. That could discourage rational discussion of drugs or deter experts from serving on government advisory committees, where Drs. Scher and Hussain first publicly voiced their opinions. “Intimidation or harassment is going to make qualified people think twice about serving in national positions,” Dr. Hussain said in a brief conversation here at the annual meeting of the American Society of Clinical Oncology. She said she would continue for now to serve on the administration’s advisory panels, but declined to comment further, saying she did not want to inflame the situation. Dr. Scher also was reluctant to comment, saying “This is a situation I’ve never been in before.” But he seemed distressed that other doctors were not rallying to his support. “There’s no one else standing up and saying this is ridiculous,” he said. When he gave a talk at the conference on Sunday, Dr. Scher was accompanied by three men wearing suits and earphones, but not conference name badges, which attendees must wear. A spokeswoman for the oncology association said it had been working with the two doctors and was increasing security at the conference. Christine Hickey, a spokeswoman for Sloan-Kettering, said Dr. Scher had received e-mail messages and phone calls, including one e-mail entitled “your murder.” A copy of his biographical page on the Sloan-Kettering website was vandalized. Provenge has become the latest focal point of a long-running and sometimes bitter debate about the degree of evidence needed for approval of drugs for life-threatening diseases. An F.D.A. advisory panel endorsed the effectiveness of the drug by a 13-4 vote in March. The panel voted 17-0 that the drug was generally safe, although there were signs it could increase the risk of strokes. Provenge was found to extend lives in two small clinical trials, though the results were somewhat weak by various statistical standards. But both Dr. Scher and Dr. Hussain, who, unlike most of the panel members, actually treat patients with prostate cancer, voted in the minority. They argued that the evidence fell short of proving that the drug worked, and that they did not want to give patients false hope. Each doctor later wrote a letter to the F.D.A. reiterating their arguments. About 15 prostate cancer survivors and advocates held a demonstration here on Saturday to urge the agency to approve Provenge. A larger rally is planned for Washington today. Dr. Charles Bennett, who organized the Saturday protest, said it was peaceful. “I absolutely don’t condone and would abhor any threatening behavior,” said Dr. Bennett, a Wisconsin physician whose grandfather and an uncle died from prostate cancer. “That is way over the line.” But he added, “There are a lot of guys with prostate cancer who are very passionate” about Provenge. of 22) Briefing | Science and Health: Cancer Treatment Found To Weaken Men's Bones Technology Briefing | Biotechnology: Prostate Cancer Treatment Approved Vaccine Useful Against Cancer In Clinical Trial Combination Of Treatments On Prostate Is Promising of 22) &#x00bb; Follow the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The
http://www.nytimes.com/pages/health/index.html?partner=rssnyt Health News - Health & Behavior New Liver Cancer Drug Is Promising, Doctors Say The new drug could become the first effective treatment for liver cancer, one of the deadliest forms of cancer. Experts Threatened After Opposing Drug for Prostate Cancer At-Home Fertility Screening Available for Men By RONI CARYN RABIN A new at-home screening test, called Fertell, lets couples find out if they have fertility problems without stepping into a doctor’s office. Cancer Experts Threatened After Opposing Drug By THE NEW YORK TIMES Two prominent experts’ public stance against the drug, Provenge, has angered some men with prostate cancer and patient advocates. After Sanctions, Doctors Get Drug Company Pay By GARDINER HARRIS and JANET ROBERTS Many doctors who were sanctioned by a medical board were later paid for research by drug makers. Graphic: One Doctor’s Story Shark Cartilage, Not a Cancer Therapy As cancer patients increasingly embrace alternative therapies, oncologists are calling for well-designed clinical trials to determine if they are helpful or harmful. 6 Billion Bits of Data About Me, Me, Me! A DNA code cracker got his genome. Lines form now for everyone else. A Television Audition for a Part in and of Life What, exactly, is so off-putting about a reality show featuring three patients competing for a kidney from a terminally ill woman? A Battle With Depression and Suicidal Tendencies By THE NEW YORK TIMES Susan Endersbe, a schizophrenic who lived in Minneapolis, battled depression all her life. Sudden death in athletes is more common than you might think. What to do about it, however, remains a dilemma. Tangle of Conflicting Accounts in TB Patient’s Odyssey Accounts of the journey of a man with a dangerous form of tuberculosis agree only in the missed chances to head off a health scandal. Graphic: TB Patient’s Travels More From The Lede Doctor Says Drug Maker Tried to Quash His Criticism of Avandia A Congressional committee is examining claims that GlaxoSmithKline tried to suppress a doctor’s criticism of a diabetes drug. Statement by Dr. John B. Buse Toxic Toothpaste Made in China Is Found in U.S. There are no reports of anyone being harmed, but the U.S. is the seventh country to find a poison in toothpaste. Kevorkian Freed After Years in Prison for Aiding Suicide Jack Kevorkian, who brought the debate over physician-assisted suicide into the spotlight, stepped out of prison having pledged not to assist anyone else. Agent at Border, Aware, Let In Man With TB By LAWRENCE K. ALTMAN A customs agent let the infected man re-enter the country despite knowing that he was being sought by authorities. Bush Requests $30 Billion to Fight AIDS Near Misses Allowed Man With Tuberculosis to Fly W.H.O. Seeks More AIDS Tests in Nations at Epidemic’s Center F.D.A. Still Unsettled in Wake of New Questions Melamine From U.S. Put in Feed Physical Culture: For Those Who Sweat, Some Small Stuff Manufacturer of Risky Drug to Sell Shares An Answer to Help Clear His Fog Obama Calls for Wider and Less Costly Health Care Coverage TB Patient Is Isolated After Taking Two Flights Ex-Chief of China Food and Drug Unit Sentenced to Death for Graft Lens Fluid Maker Says Link to Infection Unsolved Personal Health: Finding Some Calm After Living With ‘the Shakes’ For the Tiniest Babies, the Closest Thing to a Cocoon Nature’s Tricks Help Moths Say ‘Don’t Eat Me’ With Hurricanes in the Lab, They Can Blow the House Down Books: The Brain: Malleable, Capable, Vulnerable Really? : The Claim: C.L.A. Supplements Can Help You Lose Weight Genome Researchers Find New Indicators of Breast Cancer Risk Turning Off Suspect Gene Makes Mice Smarter Q & A: A Bitter Cup An Implant for the Heart Gets a Jolt From Above Tod H. Mikuriya, 73, Dies; Backed Medical Marijuana Vital Signs: Prognosis: Prolonged Use of Antibiotics After Lyme May Not Help Vital Signs: Responses: In Study of Men, Lots of Coffee Appears to Lower Risk of Gout Vital Signs: Hazards: Obese Employees More Likely to Be Injured on the Job Six Killers | Stroke: Lost Chances for Survival, Before and After Stroke Outbreak of Eye Infections Puzzles Officials : Crucial Facts About Stroke Stroke is the third leading cause of death in the United States, but many strokes that could be successfully treated are not. Some parents of children with Down syndrome want prospective parents to know the positive side of raising a child with the genetic condition. : Choosing Hip Resurfacing Keith McDonald underwent hip resurfacing surgery, a newer alternative to total hip replacement. Indoor Cycling Finds Its Way Back With Proper Training ...And Do You Take This (Buff) Woman? Effective, Yes, but Is It Safe? A Drug’s Risks ‘Sicko,’ Castro and the ‘120 Years Club’ MENTAL HEALTH & BEHAVIOR» This Is Your Life (and How You Tell It) Psychiatrists, Children and Drug Industry’s Role Heart disease, cancer, stroke, chronic obstructive pulmonary disease, diabetes and Alzheimer's disease are the leading causes of death in the U.S. - and they have a lot in common. Kevorkian Speaks After His Release From Prison In an interview, Jack Kevorkian says he will no longer advise terminally ill people how to die. But he still combatively advocates physician-assisted suicide. Jack Kevorkian on People's Rights ( Qiagen to Buy Digene, Maker of Tests for Cancer-Causing Virus Qiagen, a Dutch maker of tools for gene research, has agreed to buy the Digene Corporation for $1.6 billion in shares and cash. Jane Brody, "Personal Health" columnist, discusses the latest health news. At Risk: Where Smokers Congregate Outside Bars, a Cloud Hovers Preliminary findings suggest that outdoor secondhand smoke could constitute a health risk. More Vital Signs Columns » ‘Sicko,’ Castro and the ‘120 Years Club’ “Sicko” savages the American health care system and extols Cuba’s system as the neatest thing since the white linen guayabera. A user's guide to diagnostic tests. What you need to know about procedures and diagnoses for six major diseases. Go to Special Section » News from AP &#x00bb; Chemo and Surgery May Help Colon Cancer Abused Drug Used to Treat Heart Failure Study: Liver Cancer Breakthrough Found EU Launches Campaign to Tackle Back Pain Doctors Say Roller Shoes Injuring Kids Study: Liver Cancer Breakthrough Found Browse All Health Topics Select a Health Topic Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis (ALS) Dietary Supplements and Herbal Remedies Food Contamination and Poisoning Human Papilloma Virus (HPV) Mental Health and Disorders Post Traumatic Stress Disorder SARS (Severe Acute Respiratory Syndrome) Seasonal Affective Disorder (SAD) Sexually Transmitted Diseases (STDs) Sudden Infant Death Syndrome Suicides and Suicide Attempts Health & Fitness Tools What's your score? » Calorie Calculator for Goal Weight What's your limit? » MOST POPULAR - HEALTH After Sanctions, Doctors Get Drug Company Pay At-Home Fertility Screening Available for Men New Liver Cancer Drug Is Promising, Doctors Say Cancer Experts Threatened After Opposing Drug Shark Cartilage, Not a Cancer Therapy Tangle of Conflicting Accounts in TB Patient&#8217;s Odyssey Lost Chances for Survival, Before and After Stroke Personal Health: Finding Some Calm After Living With &#8216;the Shakes&#8217; This Is Your Life (and How You Tell It) Books: The Brain: Malleable, Capable, Vulnerable Go to Complete List » After Sanctions, Doctors Get Drug Company Pay TB Patient Moved to Specialized Hospital TB Patient Identified as Lawyer; Border Agent, Aware, Let Him In Tangle of Conflicting Accounts in TB Patient's Odyssey The Brain: Malleable, Capable, Vulnerable Tod H. Mikuriya, 73, Dies; Backed Medical Marijuana 2 Flights Carried Man With Deadly TB Shark Cartilage, Not a Cancer Therapy Break a Confidence? Never. Well, Hardly Ever. New Test Offers Men At-Home Fertility Screenings Go to Complete List » Follow the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky What’s new in technology? Buy, sell or rent a home. Get the latest business news What’s new on Broadway? Start your 30-day free trial of Times Reader today. Photos, fine art, books and more. The
http://www.nytimes.com/2007/06/03/health/03cancer.html Shark Cartilage, Not a Cancer Therapy - Health & Behavior Shark Cartilage, Not a Cancer Therapy June 3, 2007 CHICAGO, June 2 — Shark fin soup might taste good. But it will not do much for Shark cartilage, a widely used alternative therapy for cancer, did not help patients with lung cancer live longer, according to the results of one of the first rigorous studies of the approach. But two smaller studies showed some preliminary but encouraging evidence that two other complementary therapies, ginseng and flaxseed, might have some benefit for cancer patients. The studies were presented on Saturday here at the annual meeting of the American Society for Clinical Oncology, where the nation’s cancer doctors usually discuss the latest in and new biotechnology drugs. It is relatively unusual for this meeting to highlight alternative therapies, but doctors here said that might be changing. They acknowledge that many of their patients are taking these supplements — widely available in health food stores — and asking them about them. So, they said, well-designed clinical trials are needed to determine whether these approaches are helpful or harmful. “One of the most common questions patients ask me is about these things they have snookered away in their purses and pocketbooks,” said Dr. Bruce Cheson, a hematologist at , who moderated a news conference on the studies of the therapies. The shark cartilage clinical trial was mandated by Congress and was sponsored by the . It tested a shark cartilage extract being developed as a drug by Aeterna Zentaris, a Canadian company. Dr. Charles Lu of the M.D. Anderson Cancer Center in Houston, the trial’s lead investigator, said there was reason to believe the cartilage might work. Cartilage has been found to contain factors that can impede the formation of blood vessels. And cutting off the blood supply to has already been proven effective with other drugs. But in the trial, those who received the shark cartilage extract lived a median of 14.4 months, meaning that half the patients had died by that point. Those who got a placebo had a median survival of 15.6 months. The trial involved 384 patients in the United States and Canada with advanced non-small cell lung cancer. The shark cartilage extract was given as a liquid that patients drank twice a day. Results were somewhat more promising, though far less definitive, for flaxseed. That study, led by scientists at Duke University Medical Center, involved 161 men with prostate cancer who were scheduled to have their prostates removed. After the glands were removed about a month later, the tumors were studied. It was found that the tumors of the men who had taken the flaxseed had been growing about 30 percent to 40 percent more slowly than for those who did not. The ginseng study suggested that the herb might help fight fatigue, which is common in people with cancer. The study involved 282 patients with various types of cancer. About one-quarter of the patients who took 1,000 or 2,000 milligrams a day of powdered extract of ginseng root reported that their fatigue had become “moderately better” or “much better.” That contrasted with only one-tenth of those who took either a smaller amount of ginseng or a placebo. Doctors said that it was too early to recommend that patients take flaxseed or ginseng, though they said the supplements were not harmful. Debra L. Barton, an associate professor of oncology at the and the lead investigator of the ginseng study, cautioned that many ginseng supplements do not use the same ginseng, used in the study, which was grown in Wisconsin. And the quality and quantity of active ingredients in ginseng supplements can vary. The investigators said the mechanisms of action of the flaxseed and the ginseng were not well understood. Dr. Barton reverted to Chinese philosophy, referring to yin and yang, in trying to explain ginseng. “The theory is ginseng would help the body moderate the negative things going on,” she said. In a more conventional study presented here, researchers in Europe found that preventive therapy to the head reduces the risk that tumors will spread to the brain in patients with small cell lung cancer. The treatment also helped patients live longer. Small cell lung cancer accounts for 15 percent to 20 percent of all lung cancer cases, but it is an aggressive type. Previous studies had shown the benefit of preventive radiation therapy to the head for patients whose tumors were concentrated in a small area. But the new study showed the technique was helpful for patients whose cancer had spread farther into the lung or elsewhere in the body. Only 14.6 percent of those who got the head radiation had symptoms from a spread of cancer to the brain a year later. That compared with 40.4 percent in a control group. Some 27.1 percent of the treated patients were alive a year later, twice as many as the 13.3 percent of the control group. Dr. Roy Herbst, a lung cancer specialist at the M.D. Anderson Cancer Center who was not involved in the study, said the findings would “change the standard of care almost immediately.” of 22) and Complementary Medicine of 22) &#x00bb; Follow the Frugal Traveler on his 12-week cross-country journey See how the trip began What did he think of the Armuchee Bluegrass Festival? Tell him where to go in Tennessee and Kentucky Media & Advertising &#x00bb; The Lede: Paris Hilton Reports to Prison ‘Grey Gardens’ Provides the Role of a Life Home Fires: Iraq Veterans Return All of a Sudden, the Weather Is Controversial The
